California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(III) Placement in the facility is the only alternative that permits the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to have daily 24-hour access to the child in accordance with the case plan, to participate fully in meeting all of the daily needs of the child, including feeding and personal hygiene, and to have access to necessary reunification services.

(B) A child who is 6 to 12 years of age, inclusive, may be placed in a community care facility licensed as a group home for children vendored by a regional center or a short-term residential therapeutic program
 under the following conditions:

(i) The deputy director of the county welfare department shall approve the case prior to initial placement.

(ii) The short-term, specialized, and intensive treatment period shall not exceed six months, unless the county has made progress or is actively working toward implementing the case plan that identifies the services or supports necessary to transition the child to a family setting, circumstances beyond the county’s control have prevented the county from obtaining those services or supports within the timeline documented in the case plan, and the need for additional time pursuant to the case plan is documented by the caseworker and approved by a deputy director or director of the county child welfare department.

(iii) To the extent that placements pursuant to this paragraph are extended beyond an initial six months, the requirements of this subparagraph shall apply to each extension. In addition, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department shall approve the continued placement no less frequently than every 60 days.

(10) Any child placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall be either of the following:

(A) A child who has been assessed as meeting one of the placement requirements set forth in subdivisions (b) and (h) of Section 11462.01.

(B) A child under six years of age who is placed with their minor parent or for the
 purpose of reunification pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (9).

(11) The home of a relative in which the juvenile court has authorized placement, regardless of the status of any criminal record exemption or resource family approval, if the court has found that the placement does not pose a risk to the health and
 safety of the child.

(12) This subdivision does not allow a social worker to place any dependent child outside the United States, except as specified in subdivision (f).

(f) (1) A child under the supervision of a social worker pursuant to subdivision (e) shall not be placed outside the United States prior to a judicial finding that the placement is in the best interest of the child, except as required by federal law or treaty.

(2) The party or agency requesting placement of the child outside the United States shall carry the burden of proof and shall show, by clear and convincing evidence, that placement outside the United States is in the best interest of the child.

(3) In determining the best interest of the child, the court shall consider, but not be limited to, all of the following factors:

(A) Placement with a relative.

(B) Placement of siblings in the same home.

(C) Amount and nature of any contact between the child and the potential guardian or caretaker.

(D) Physical and medical needs of the dependent child.

(E) Psychological and emotional needs of the dependent child.

(F) Social, cultural, and educational needs of the dependent child.

(G) Specific desires of any dependent child who is 12 years of age or older.

(4) If the court finds that a placement outside the United States is, by clear and convincing evidence, in the best interest of the child, the court may issue an order authorizing the social worker to make a placement outside the United States. A child subject to this subdivision shall not leave the United States prior to the issuance of the order described in this paragraph.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “outside the United States” shall not include the lands of any federally recognized American Indian tribe or Alaskan Natives.

(6) This subdivision shall not apply to the
 placement of a dependent child with a parent pursuant to subdivision (a).

(g) (1) If the child is taken from the physical custody of the child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian and unless the child is placed with relatives, the child shall be placed in foster care in the county of residence of the child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian in order to facilitate reunification of the family.

(2) If there are no appropriate placements available in the parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s county of residence, a placement may be made in an appropriate place in another county, preferably a county located adjacent to the parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s community of residence.

(3) This section does not require multiple disruptions of the child’s placement corresponding to frequent changes of residence by the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian. In determining whether the child should be moved, the social worker shall take into consideration the potential harmful effects of disrupting the placement of the child and the parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s reason for the move.

(4) If it has been determined that it is necessary for a child to be placed in a county other than the child’s, parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s county of residence, the specific reason the out-of-county placement is necessary shall be
 documented in the child’s case plan. If the reason the out-of-county placement is necessary is the lack of resources in the sending county to meet the specific needs of the child, those specific resource needs shall be documented in the case plan.

(5) If it has been determined that a child is to be placed out of county either in a group home for children vendored by a regional center or a short-term residential therapeutic program, or with a foster family agency for subsequent placement in a certified foster family home, and the sending county is to maintain responsibility for supervision and visitation of the child, the sending county shall develop a plan of supervision and visitation that specifies the supervision and visitation activities to be performed and specifies that the sending county is responsible for performing those activities.
 In addition to the plan of supervision and visitation, the sending county shall document information regarding any known or suspected dangerous behavior of the child that indicates the child may pose a safety concern in the receiving county. Upon implementation of the statewide child welfare information system, the plan of supervision and visitation, as well as information regarding any known or suspected dangerous behavior of the child, shall be made available to the receiving county upon placement of the child in the receiving county. If placement occurs on a weekend or holiday, the information shall be made available to the receiving county on or before the end of the next business day.

(6) If it has been determined that a child is to be placed out of county and the sending county plans that the receiving county shall be responsible
 for the supervision and visitation of the child, the sending county shall develop a formal agreement between the sending and receiving counties. The formal agreement shall specify the supervision and visitation to be provided the child, and shall specify that the receiving county is responsible for providing the supervision and visitation. The formal agreement shall be approved and signed by the sending and receiving counties prior to placement of the child in the receiving county. In addition, upon completion of the case plan, the sending county shall provide a copy of the completed case plan to the receiving county. The case plan shall include information regarding any known or suspected dangerous behavior of the child that indicates the child may pose a safety concern to the receiving county.

(h) (1) Subject to paragraph
 (2), if the social worker must change the placement of the child and is unable to find a suitable placement within the county and must place the child outside the county, the placement shall not be made until the social worker has served written notice on the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, the child’s tribe, the child’s attorney, and, if the child is 10 years of age or older, on the child, at least 14 days prior to the placement, unless the child’s health or well-being is endangered by delaying the action or would be endangered if prior notice were given. The notice shall state the reasons that require placement outside the county. The child or parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or the child’s tribe may object to the placement not later than seven days after receipt of the notice and, upon objection, the court shall hold a hearing not later than five days after the objection and prior to the
 placement. The court shall order out-of-county placement if it finds that the child’s particular needs require placement outside the county.

(2) (A) The notice required prior to placement, as described in paragraph (1), may be waived if the child and family team has determined that the identified placement is in the best interest of the child, no member of the child and family team objects to the placement, and the child’s attorney has been informed of the intended placement and has no objection, and, if applicable, the Indian custodian or child’s tribe has been informed of the intended placement and has no objection.

(B) If the child is transitioning from a temporary shelter care facility, as described in Section 11462.022, and all of the circumstances
 set forth in subparagraph (A) do not exist, the county shall provide oral notice to the child’s parents, guardian, Indian custodian, the child’s tribe, the child’s attorney, and, if the child is 10 years of age or older, to the child no later than one business day after the determination that out-of-county placement is necessary and the circumstances in subparagraph (A) do not exist. The oral notice shall state the reasons that require placement outside the county and shall be immediately followed by written notice stating the reasons. The child, parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or tribe may object to the placement not later than seven days after oral notice is provided and, upon objection, the court shall hold a hearing not later than two judicial days after the objection is made. The court may authorize that the child remain in the temporary shelter care facility pending the outcome of the hearing.
 The court shall order out-of-county placement if it finds that the child’s particular needs require placement outside the county. This subparagraph does not preclude placement of the child without prior notice if the child’s health or well-being is endangered by delaying the action or would be endangered if prior notice were given.

(i) If the court has ordered removal of the child from the physical custody of the child’s parents pursuant to Section 361, the court shall consider whether the family ties and best interest of the child will be served by granting visitation rights to the child’s grandparents. The court shall clearly specify those rights to the social worker.

(j) If the court has ordered removal of the child from the physical custody of the child’s parents pursuant to
 Section 361, the court shall consider whether there are any siblings under the court’s jurisdiction, or any nondependent siblings in the physical custody of a parent subject to the court’s jurisdiction, the nature of the relationship between the child and their siblings, the appropriateness of developing or maintaining the sibling relationships pursuant to Section 16002, and the impact of the sibling relationships on the child’s placement and planning for legal permanence.

(k) (1) An agency shall ensure placement of a child in a home that, to the fullest extent possible, best meets the day-to-day needs of the child. A home that best meets the day-to-day needs of the child shall satisfy all of the following criteria:

(A) The child’s caregiver is able to
 meet the day-to-day health, safety, and well-being needs of the child.

(B) The child’s caregiver is permitted to maintain the least restrictive family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences and that serves the day-to-day needs of the child.

(C) The child is permitted to engage in reasonable, age-appropriate day-to-day activities that promote normal
 childhood experiences for the foster child.

(2) The foster child’s caregiver shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, to determine day-to-day activities that are age appropriate to meet the needs of the child. This section does not permit a child’s caregiver to permit the child to engage in day-to-day activities that carry an unreasonable risk of harm, or subject the child to abuse or neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 15.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

361.21.

(a) The court shall not order or approve the placement of a child or nonminor dependent in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, unless the court finds, in its order of
 placement and based on evidence presented by the county placing agency, that all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The out-of-state group home is licensed or certified for the placement of children by an agency of the state in which the child or nonminor dependent will be placed.

(2) The out-of-state residential facility has been certified by the State Department of Social Services or is exempt from that certification, pursuant to Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(3) On and after July 1, 2021, the county placing agency has fulfilled its responsibilities as set forth in Sections 4096 and 16010.9.

(4) The court has reviewed the documentation of any required assessment, technical assistance efforts, or recommendations and finds that in-state facilities or programs are unavailable or inadequate to meet the needs of the child or nonminor dependent.

(b) At least every six months, the court shall review
 each placement made pursuant to subdivision (a) in order to determine compliance with that subdivision.

(c) A county shall not be entitled to receive or expend any public funds for the placement of a child or nonminor dependent in an out-of-state residential facility unless the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) are met.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2022, the court shall
 not order or approve any new placement of a child by a county child welfare agency in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the court shall order any child placed out of state by a county child welfare agency in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, to be returned to California no later than January 1, 2023, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 19.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

361.22.

(a) (1) For a placement made on or after October 1, 2021, each placement of a child or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic program, including the initial placement and each subsequent placement into a short-term residential therapeutic program, shall be reviewed by the court within 45 days of the start of placement in accordance with this section. In no event shall the court grant a continuance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 352 that would cause the review to be completed more than 60 days after the start of the placement.

(2) For a placement made on or after July 1, 2022, each placement of a child or nonminor dependent in a community treatment facility, including the initial placement and each subsequent placement into a community treatment facility, shall be reviewed by the court within 45 days of the start of placement in accordance with this section. In no event shall the court grant a continuance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 352 that would cause the review to be completed more than 60 days after the start of the placement.

(b) (1) At any time after the decision to place a child or nonminor dependent into a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community
 treatment facility has been made, but no later than five calendar days following each placement,
 the social worker shall request the court to schedule a hearing to review the placement.

(2) The social worker shall serve a copy of the request on all parties to the proceeding, the child’s or nonminor dependent’s court appointed special advocate, if applicable, and the child’s tribe in the case of an Indian child.

(c) (1) The social worker shall prepare and submit a report that shall include all of the following:

(A) A copy of the assessment, determination as to the services and care needs of the child or nonminor dependent, and documentation prepared by the qualified individual pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 4096.

(B) The case plan documentation required pursuant to subparagraph (C) of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16501.1.

(C) In the case of an Indian child, a statement regarding whether the child’s tribe had an opportunity to confer regarding the departure from the placement preferences described in Section 361.31, and the active efforts made prior to placement in a short-term therapeutic program or community treatment facility to satisfy subdivision (f) of Section 224.1.

(D) A statement regarding whether the child or nonminor dependent or any party to the proceeding, or the child’s tribe in the case of an Indian child, objects to the placement of the child or nonminor dependent in the short-term residential therapeutic
 program or community treatment facility.

(2) The social worker shall serve a copy of the report to all parties to the proceeding no later than seven calendar days before the hearing.

(d) Within five calendar days of the request described in subdivision (b), the court shall set a hearing to be held within 45 days after the start of the placement and give notice of the hearing to all parties to the proceeding, and the child’s tribe in the case of an Indian child.

(e) When reviewing each placement of the child or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community treatment
 facility,
 the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the information specified in subdivision (c).

(2) Determine whether the needs of the child or nonminor dependent can be met through placement in a family-based setting, or, if not, whether placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program
 or community treatment facility, as applicable, provides the most effective and appropriate care setting for the child or nonminor dependent in the least restrictive environment. A shortage or lack of family homes shall not be an appropriate reason for determining that the needs of the child cannot be met in a family-based setting.

(3) Determine whether a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility level of care, as applicable, is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the child or nonminor dependent.

(4) In the case of an Indian child, determine
 whether there is good cause to depart from the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(5) Approve or disapprove the placement.

(6) Make a finding, either in writing or on the record, of the basis for its determinations pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the court disapproves the placement, the court shall order the social worker to transition the child or nonminor dependent to a placement setting that is consistent with the determinations made pursuant to subdivision (e) within 30 days of the disapproval.

(g) This section does not prohibit the court from reviewing the placement of a child or nonminor dependent in a short-term residential therapeutic program
 or community treatment facility pursuant to subdivision (a) at a regularly scheduled hearing if that hearing is held within 60 days of the placement and the information described in subdivision (c) has been presented to the court.

(h) (1) On or before October 1, 2021, for placements into a short-term residential therapeutic program, the Judicial Council shall amend or adopt rules of court and shall develop or amend appropriate forms, as necessary, to implement this section, including developing a procedure to enable the court to review the placement without a hearing.

(2) On or before October 1, 2022, for placements into a community treatment facility, the Judicial Council shall amend or adopt rules of court and shall develop or amend appropriate forms, as necessary, to implement this section, including developing a procedure to enable the court to review the placement without a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 18.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

361.23.

(a) (1) Whenever voluntary admission into a psychiatric residential treatment facility is sought for a child or nonminor dependent who is subject to a petition pursuant to Section 300, the court shall review the application for a voluntary admission as described in this section. A child may not be admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility prior to court authorization unless the child is subject to an involuntary hold pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5585.50) of Part 1.5 of Division 5.

(2) For purposes of this section, “voluntary admission” for a child within the custody of a parent, child, or Indian custodian refers to the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian’s voluntary decision to have the
 child admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility. “Voluntary admission” for a child not within the custody of a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian refers to the child’s decision to voluntarily admit themselves pursuant to Section 6552. “Voluntary admission” for a nonminor dependent refers to the nonminor dependent’s decision to voluntarily admit themselves.

(b) (1) When a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian who retains physical custody of a child under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 seeks to have a child admitted to a psychiatric residential treatment facility or when a child who is the subject of a petition pursuant to Section 300 seeks to make a voluntary admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility pursuant to Section 6552, the social worker shall file an ex parte application for an order authorizing the voluntary admission pursuant to Section 6552 within
 48 hours of being informed of the request or, if the courts are closed for more than 48 hours after being informed of the request, on the first judicial day after being informed of the request. The application shall satisfy the requirements of Title 3 of the California Rules of Court, and include all of the following:

(A) A brief description of the child’s mental disorder.

(B) The name of the psychiatric residential treatment facility proposed for treatment.

(C) A brief description of how the mental disorder may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by the course of treatment offered by the psychiatric residential treatment facility.

(D) A brief description of why the facility is the least restrictive setting for care and why there are no
 other available hospitals, programs, or facilities which might better serve the child’s medical needs and best interest.

(E) A copy of the child welfare agency’s plan developed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10.

(F) (i) If the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is seeking the child’s admission to the facility, the basis of their belief that the child’s admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility is necessary.

(ii) If the child is seeking admission, whether the parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian agrees with the child’s request for admission.

(G) A description of any mental health services, including community-based mental health services, that were offered or provided to the child and
 an explanation of why those services were not sufficient, or an explanation for why no such services were offered or provided.

(H) A statement describing how the child was given an opportunity to confer privately with their counsel regarding the admission, as required by Section 6552.

(I) A brief description of whether any member of the minor’s child and family team objects to the admission, and the reasons for the objection, if any.

(J) The information required by this paragraph shall be sufficient to satisfy the applicant’s initial burden of establishing the need for an ex parte hearing required by subdivision (c) of Rule 3.1202 of the California Rules of Court.

(2) Upon receipt of an ex parte application pursuant to paragraph (1), the juvenile court
 shall schedule a hearing for the next judicial day. The court clerk shall immediately notify the social worker and the child’s counsel of the date, time, and place for the hearing.

(3) The social worker shall provide notice of the hearing in accordance with Title 3 of the California Rules of Court to all parties to the proceeding and their counsel of record, the child’s tribe in the case of an Indian child, the child’s court-appointed special advocate, if applicable, and any person designated as the child’s educational or developmental representative pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 361. The provisions in subdivision (c) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to notice of the hearing. The social worker shall make arrangements for the child to be transported to the hearing.

(c) (1) At the hearing, the court shall consider evidence in
 the form of oral testimony under oath, affidavit or declaration, or other admissible evidence, including a child welfare agency court report, as to all of the following:

(A) (i) Whether the child suffers from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the psychiatric residential treatment facility in which the child wishes to be placed.

(ii) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility is the least restrictive setting for care.

(iii) Whether there any available hospital, program, or facility which might better serve the child’s medical needs and best interest, including less restrictive facilities or community-based services.

(B) Whether and how the
 child, parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian, as appropriate, has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(C) Whether and how the social worker addressed the possible voluntary admission with the child’s attorney, including whether the child was given the opportunity to confer privately with their attorney about a voluntary admission.

(D) Whether and how the possible voluntary admission was addressed with the child and family team, whether any member of the team objects to voluntary admission, and the reasons for the objection.

(E) The county child welfare agency plan for the child, as described in Section 16010.10.

(F) Whether the child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian has taken reasonable steps to address the child’s mental health disorder.

(2) (A) If the child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian seeks to give voluntary consent to the child’s admission, the court shall inquire about the child’s position on the admission.

(B) If the child seeks to give voluntary consent to admission, the court shall inquire whether they knowingly and intelligently consent to admission into the psychiatric residential treatment facility, including whether they are giving consent without fear or threat of detention or initiation of conservatorship proceedings.

(3) The court shall not continue the hearing unless the child consents to the continuance and the court determines that additional evidence is
 necessary to support the findings required by subdivision (c). Any continuance shall be for only such period of time as is necessary to obtain the evidence and only if it is not detrimental to the child.

(d) (1) The court may grant a request to have the child admitted, or authorize a child’s voluntary consent to admission, into a psychiatric residential treatment facility, only if it finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) That the child suffers from a mental disorder which may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the hospital, facility, or program in which the child wishes to be placed.

(B) That the psychiatric residential treatment facility is the least restrictive setting needed to treat the child’s mental
 disorder.

(C) That there is no other available hospital, program, or facility which might better serve the child’s medical needs and best interest, including community-based mental health services.

(D) That the child has given knowing and intelligent consent to admission to the facility and that the consent was not made under fear or threat of detention or initiation of conservatorship proceedings.

(E) That the child and, where appropriate, the parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian have been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(2) (A) When authorizing a parent’s request for admission or the child’s
 voluntary consent, the court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the child welfare agency promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the child is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition into another setting.

(B) The court’s order authorizing the admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall be effective until the first of the following events occurs: (1) the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian, or the child if admission was granted pursuant to Section 6552, withdraws consent for the child to be present in the psychiatric residential treatment facility, (2) the court finds that the child no longer suffers from a mental disorder that may reasonably expected to be ameliorated by the treatment offered by the facility or that the psychiatric residential treatment facility is no longer the least restrictive alternative for the
 treatment of the child’s mental health needs, or (3) the court makes a superseding order. This section does not require a court order to discharge a child if the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or child withdraws their consent for admission.

(3) For children who were in the custody of their parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian at the time of the authorization of admission and based on the evidence presented during the ex parte hearing, the court shall consider whether the parent’s, legal guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s conduct contributed to the deterioration of the child’s mental disorder. If the court determines that the parent’s, legal guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s conduct may have contributed to the deterioration, it shall direct the county child welfare agency to investigate whether the child may be safely returned to the custody of the parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian upon their discharge from the psychiatric
 residential treatment facility and to take appropriate action, including, but not limited to, taking the child into temporary custody prior to the child’s discharge from the facility and filing a subsequent petition pursuant to Section 342 or a supplemental petition pursuant to Section 387.

(e) (1) Whenever a nonminor dependent seeks to voluntarily consent to admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, the social worker shall file an ex parte application within 48 hours of the request, or, if the courts are closed for more than 48 hours after being informed of the request, on the first judicial day after being informed of the request, for a hearing to address whether the nonminor dependent has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate, and give informed voluntary consent to admission.
 The application shall satisfy the requirements of Title 3 of the California Rules of Court, and include all of the following:

(A) A brief description of the medical necessity for admission into a psychiatric residential treatment facility.

(B) The name of the psychiatric residential treatment facility proposed for treatment.

(C) A copy of the child welfare agency’s plan developed pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10.

(D) A description of any mental health services, including community-based mental health services, that were offered or provided to the nonminor dependent and an explanation for why those services were not sufficient, or an explanation for why no such services were offered or provided.

(E) A brief description of why the nonminor dependent believes admission to a less restrictive facility would not adequately address their mental disorder.

(F) A statement describing how the nonminor dependent was given the opportunity to confer privately with their counsel regarding the application.

(G) The information required by this paragraph shall be sufficient to satisfy the applicant’s initial burden of establishing the need for an ex parte hearing required by subdivision (c) of Rule 3.1202 of the California Rules of Court.

(2) Upon receipt of an ex parte application pursuant to paragraph (1), the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing for the next judicial day. The court clerk shall immediately notify the social worker and nonminor dependent’s
 counsel of the date, time, and place for the hearing.

(3) The social worker shall provide notice of the hearing in accordance with Title 3 of the California Rules of Court to all parties to the proceeding and their counsel of record, the nonminor dependent’s tribe, if applicable, the nonminor dependent’s court-appointed special advocate, if applicable, and any person designated as the nonminor dependent’s educational or developmental representative pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 361. The provisions in subdivision (c) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply to notice of the hearing. The social worker shall make arrangements for the nonminor dependent to be present for the hearing.

(4) At the hearing, the court shall consider evidence in the form of oral testimony under oath, affidavit or declaration, or other admissible evidence, as to all of the
 following:

(A) Whether the nonminor dependent’s receipt of treatment in the psychiatric residential treatment facility is medically necessary.

(B) Whether any less restrictive treatment setting could serve the nonminor dependent’s treatment needs, including a less restrictive facility or community-based services.

(C) Whether and how the nonminor dependent has been advised of the nature of inpatient psychiatric services, patient’s rights as identified in Section 6006, and their right to contact a patients’ rights advocate.

(D) Whether and how the social worker addressed the voluntary admission with the nonminor dependent’s attorney, including whether the nonminor dependent was given the opportunity to confer privately with their attorney about a
 voluntary admission.

(E) Whether and how the possible voluntary admission was addressed with the child and family team, whether any member of the team objects to voluntary admission, and the reasons for the objection.

(F) Whether the nonminor dependent gives knowing and intelligent consent to admission.

(G) The county child welfare agency’s plan for the nonminor dependent, as described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10.

(5) (A) At the hearing, the court shall make a finding whether the nonminor dependent has given knowing and intelligent consent to admission. If the court finds that the nonminor dependent has not given knowing and intelligent consent, it shall direct the social worker to convey its finding to the
 facility and direct the facility to discharge the nonminor dependent in accordance with the nonminor dependent’s aftercare plan. The social worker shall ensure that the aftercare plan is implemented to ensure integration with the nonminor dependent’s family, school, and community upon discharge. If the court finds that the nonminor dependent has given knowing and intelligent consent, nothing in this section requires a court order to discharge the nonminor if the nonminor dependent subsequently withdraws their consent.

(B) (i) The court may make any orders necessary to ensure that the child welfare agency promptly makes all necessary arrangements to ensure that the nonminor dependent is discharged in a timely manner and with all services and supports in place as necessary for a successful transition into a less restrictive setting.

(ii) The judicial
 proceedings described in this subdivision shall not delay a nonminor dependent’s access to medically necessary services as defined in Section 14059.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United States Code, which may include voluntary admission to a psychiatric residential treatment facility for inpatient psychiatric services, while the judicial proceedings are ongoing.

(f) (1) (A) No later than 60 days following the admission of a child to a psychiatric residential treatment facility, and every 30 days thereafter, the court shall hold a review hearing on the child’s placement in the facility based upon the medical necessity of that placement.

(B) If the hearing described in subparagraph (A) coincides with the date for a status review hearing for a child pursuant to Section 364, 366.21, 366.22,
 366.25, or 366.3, the court may hold the hearing simultaneously with the status review hearing.

(C) At the hearing described in subparagraph (A), the court shall consider all of the following:

(i) Whether the parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or child consents, or continues to consent, to the voluntary admission made pursuant to this section.

(ii) Whether the child continues to suffer from a mental disorder that may reasonably be expected to be cured or ameliorated by a course of treatment offered by the facility.

(iii) Whether there continues to be no other available less restrictive hospital, program, facility, or community-based mental health service which might better serve the child’s medical needs and best interest.

(iv) Whether the psychiatric residential treatment facility, which is licensed pursuant to Section 4081, continues to meet its legal obligation to provide services to the child.

(v) The county child welfare agency’s plan as described in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16010.10, and the agency’s actions to implement that plan.
